Oklahoma, session 2025, SB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1-2502, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1-2502. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:


1. There is a critical shortage of providers of emergency care


for:


a. the delivery of fast, efficient emergency medical care


for the sick and injured at the scene of a medical


emergency and during transport to a health care


facility, and


b. the delivery of stabilizing and definitive care at a


health care facility; and



Req. No. 457 Page 1


2. Improved emergency service is required to reduce the


mortality rate during the first critical minutes immediately


following the onset of a medical emergency; and


3. Solely for purposes of eligibility for federal funding,


emergency medical services provided by an ambulance service managed


by a municipality, county, ambulance service district, or other


public entity shall be considered essential services.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-457 DC 12/30/2024 3:54:09 PM























Req. No. 457 Page 2